Utah statutes.
53A-1a-503.   Purpose.

The purposes of the state's charter schools as a whole are to:

(1)  continue to improve student learning;

(2)  encourage the use of different and innovative teaching methods;

(3)  create new professional opportunities for educators that will allow them to actively participate in designing and implementing the learning program at the school;

(4)  increase choice of learning opportunities for students;

(5)  establish new models of public schools and a new form of accountability for schools that emphasizes the measurement of learning outcomes and the creation of innovative measurement tools;

(6)  provide opportunities for greater parental involvement in management decisions at the school level; and

(7)  expand public school choice in areas where schools have been identified for school improvement, corrective action, or restructuring under the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.



Amended by Chapter 319, 2008 General Session

